Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 86 Rhode Island Community Supports Academy
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-86-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares as follows:

There is a distinct shortage in Rhode Island of workers who are trained and certified to function in direct support of individuals with developmental and/or learning disabilities who have special needs.

The Paul V. Sherlock Center for Disabilities was established in 1993 at Rhode Island College for the express purpose of supporting community membership for individuals with disabilities in school, work and society.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 86.

16-86-2.
Feasibility study for academy.

The Rhode Island board of governors for higher education (RIBGHE), working in collaboration with the office of health and human services (OHHS) and the Rhode Island department of labor and training (RIDLT), shall conduct a study to determine the need for and assess the feasibility of establishing a Rhode Island community supports academy at the Paul V. Sherlock Center at Rhode Island College. This academy would provide education and training for individuals who are interested in functioning in direct support roles for people in Rhode Island with developmental and/or learning disabilities that have special needs.

The feasibility study will include an analysis of need and cost analysis for a 12-18 credit certification program for entry-level workers interested in working with children and adults with special needs. In developing this analysis, (RIBGHE), (OHHS) and (RIDLT) will consider:

The proposed coursework and supervised field placement component for the certificate program;

The employment needs of hospital and community-based settings; home-based services; child and adult day care settings; school settings and other settings that may work with adults and children who have special needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 383, § 1.

16-86-3.
Input of interested parties.

In conducting the feasibility study, (RIBGHE), (OHHS) and (RIDLT) will solicit input from a variety of interested parties, including, but not limited to:

Administration and staff of the Paul V. Sherlock Center.

Administrators and faculty from Rhode Island-based institutions of higher education that currently offer coursework and degrees related to special needs adults and children.

Appropriate community organizations that support the advancement of special needs individuals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 383, § 1.

16-86-4.
Reporting deadline.

(RIBGHE), (OHHS) and (RIDLT) shall submit the aforementioned study to the Rhode Island general assembly by February 1, 2008, with its findings and recommendations, including an assessment of the size of the market for the certification program, the cost and feasibility to establish the program, and, assuming the study deems it feasible, proposed actions and recommendations to establish the Rhode Island community supports academy at the Paul V. Sherlock Center at Rhode Island College. Following the receipt and review of the study, the general assembly may report out a bill to begin establishment of the academy to the regular session of the 122nd legislature.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 383, § 1.